lexicon/apertium-krc.krc.twol
Alphabet

 А а  Б б  В в  Г г  Д д  Е е
 Ё ё  Ж ж  З з  И и  Й й  К к  Л л
 М м  Н н  О о  П п  Р р  С с  Т т
 У у  Ф ф  Х х  Ц ц  Ч ч  Ш ш  Щ щ
 Ъ ъ  Ы ы  Ь ь  Э э  Ю ю  Я я  

 %{I%}:ы ! %{I%}:и %{I%}:у %{I%}:ю %{I%}:0
 %{y%}:ы %{y%}:и %{y%}:у %{y%}:ю %{y%}:0
 %{G%}:г ! %{G%}:х %{G%}:0
 %{D%}:д ! %{D%}:т
 %{N%}:н ! %{N%}:0
 %{R%}:р %{R%}:л %{R%}:н
 %{A%}:а ! %{A%}:е 
 %{E%}:а %{E%}:е %{E%}:й
 %{ъ%}:0   ! for forms with гъ that alternates with к etc.
 %{s%}:0 ! %{s%}:с 
 %{р%}:р %{р%}:0
 %{n%}:н %{n%}:0
 %{е%}:0 

%{а%}:0
%{э%}:0
%{о%}:0
%{ү%}:0

%{н%}:0
%{з%}:0
%{т%}:0


 %{·%}:0
 %{☭%}:0
 %{❗%}:0
 %{ꚜ%}:0   ! force back harmony
 %{ь%}:0   ! force front harmony

 %-

 %>:0  ;

Sets

Vow =     А Э И О У Я Е Ы Ё Ю 
          а э и о у я е ы ё ю ; 

FrontVow = Э Е И
           э е и ;

BackVow = А О Ы У 
          а о ы у ;

BackRoundVow = О У
               о у ;

AmbigVow = Ё Ю
           ё ю ;

Cns =     Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ў Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ 
          б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ў ф х ц ч ш щ 
          %{s%} %{n%} %{р%} %{G%} %{D%} %{L%} %{N%} ; 

CnsRight = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т Ў Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ 
           б в г д ж з й к л м н о п р с т ў ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ; 

AbstrCns = %{s%} %{n%} %{р%} %{G%} %{D%} %{L%} %{N%} ; 

RealCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
          б в г д ж з й к л м н о п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ; 

VclsCns = с б т ш ч х д ж щ ф п ;

AbsVow = %{а%} %{э%} %{о%} %{ү%} ;


Rules 



!!!! Dative stuff !!!!

"{G} of dative deletes after px.sg"
%{G%}:0 <=> %{I%}: [ м | [ н г ] | %{n%}: ] %>: _ %{ъ%}: %{A%}: ; 


"{ъ} of dative or p1.sg is ъ only in back vowel context after г"
%{ъ%}:ъ <=> [ :BackVow [ :у | :Cns ]* ]/:0* [ :к | :г ] _ ;
                                   [ :к | :г ] _ :BackVow ;
            [ .#. | :BackVow ] :AmbigVow/[ :0 - %{ь%}: ] [ :к | :г ] _ ;
        except
            %{G%}:н _ ; ! seems to be necessary to avoid conflicts
            [ [ :AmbigVow | :FrontVow ] :у :Cns* ]/:0* [ :к | :г ] _ ;  ! кёзюуге, сермешиуге

!%{ъ%}:ъ <=> :BackVow [ :Cns ]*/[ :0 | :ъ ]* %{G%}:г _ ;
!        except
!            %{G%}:н _ ;  ! not sure why this isn't already excluded, but seems to be necessary to avoid conflicts

!@ х:х а:а л:л к:к ъ:ъ >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:ъ {A}:а

!"{ъ} of dative deletes after sg px endings, when {G}:х, when {A}:е"
!%{ъ%}:0 <=> [ %{I%}: м | %{I%}: н г | %{n%}: ] %>: %{G%}: _ %{A%}: ; 
!                                                  %{G%}:х _ %{A%}:а ;
!                                                          _ :FrontVow ; 
!                                             :FrontVow :к _ ;
!                     [ :с | :б | :т | :ш | :т ь: ] %>: :х _ :а  ; 
!              [ :с | :б | :т | :ш | :т ь: ] %>: %{н%}: :х _ :а  ; 
!                                     :н %>: %{н%}: %{G%}: _ %{A%}: ; 

!@ а:а т:т >:0 {I}:ы м:м >:0 {G}:0 {ъ}:0 {A}:а

!@ с:с а:а й:й л:л а:а н:н >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:0 {A}:а н:н >:0 д:д {I}:ы 

!@ б:б а:а ш:ш л:л а:а н:н >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:0 {A}:а н:н >:0 д:д {I}:ы 

"{G} is х after voiceless consonants in back vowel contexts"
%{G%}:х <=> [ :VclsCns ( ь: ) ]/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* %>: _ %{ъ%}: :а  ;

!@ с е к у н д {☭}:0 >:0 {G}:х {ъ}:0 {A}:а

!@ к:к ъ:ъ а:а т:т ы:ы ш:ш >:0 {G}:х {ъ}:0 {A}:а н:н >:0 д:д {I}:ы 

!@ а:а х:х ы:ы р:р >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:н >:0 {G}:0 {ъ}:0 {A}:а 

!@ д:д ж:ж а:а н:н >:0 {I}:0 г:г {ъ}:ъ {I}:ы з:з 

!@ к:к е:е ч:ч >:0 {I}:и р:р {A}:е к:к {ъ}:0

!@ и:и н:н с:с т:т и:и т:т у:у т:т >:0 {G}:х {ъ}:0 {A}:а	

!@ к:к е:е с:с е:е к:г >:0 {s}:0 {I}:и {n}:0

!@ к:к ю:ю н:н б:б а:а т:т ы:ы ш:ш >:0 {G}:х {ъ}:0 {A}:а

!@ д:д е:е >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:0 {A}:е н:н

"{G}{ъ} as нг after nasals - н"
%{G%}:н <=> [ :н | :м | [ :н :г ] ]/:0* _ ;
        except
            %{I%}: [ м | [ н г ] | %{n%}: ] %>: _  %{ъ%}: %{A%}: ;  ! we need to delete when px.sg
            %{❗%}:0 _ ;  ! this is an orthography error, but good for analysis

"{G}{ъ} as нг after nasals - г"
%{ъ%}:г <=> %{G%}:н _ ;


!!!! Voicing !!!!

"Voicing between vowels"
к:г <=> :Vow _ (:ъ) %>: (:0) :Vow ;  

!@ к:к е:е с:с е:е к:г >:0 {s}:0 {I}:и {n}:0

!@ а:а р:р а:а л:л ы:ы к:г ъ:ъ >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0


!!!! Vowel harmony !!!!

"{A} as е after front vowels"
%{A%}:е <=> :FrontVow [ [ :у | :Cns ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - %{ꚜ%}: ] | :ь | %{ъ%}: | %{n%}: ]* _ ;
            [ [ :Cns | :FrontVow ] :AmbigVow [ :у | :Cns ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - %{ꚜ%}: ] | :ь | %{ъ%}: ]* _ ;
            %{ь%}: [ :Cns | %{ъ%}: | [ :0 - %{ь%}: ] | %-: ]* _ ; ! for forced front harmony
            :Cns л ь: [ :Cns | :0 ]* _ ;   ! for words like ансамбль/ансамблда
            [ \[ :Cns | :BackVow | :ъ ] :у :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/:0 _ ;  ! for words like кёзюуюнде
            %{э%}: [ [ :0 - %{э%}: ] | :Cns | %-: ]* _ ; ! for numerals and abbreviations

!@ ё:ё м:м ю:ю р:р >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:0 {A}:е

!@ к:к е:е с:с е:е к:к >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:0 {A}:е

!@ п р а в и т е л ь с т в о >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:ъ {A}:а

!@ ё т {ь}:0 >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:0 {A}:е н

"{I} as и after front unrounded vowels"
%{I%}:и <=> :FrontVow :Cns+/[ [ :0 - [ %{ꚜ%}: | AbsVow: ] ] | :ь | %{ъ%}:0 ]* _ ;
            %{э%}: [ [ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{ꚜ%}: ] ] | :Cns | %-: ]* _ ; ! for numerals and abbreviations
        except
            %{n%}: %>: %{N%}: _ .#. ; ! after px3sp


"{I} as ю after front rounded vowels"
%{I%}:ю <=> [ [ :Cns | :FrontVow ] :AmbigVow [ :у | :Cns ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - [ %{ꚜ%}: | AbsVow: ] ] | :ь | %{ъ%}:0 ]* _ ;
            :FrontVow [ :у :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{ꚜ%}: ] ]* _ ; ! e.g., тёлеую
            ! [ \[ :Cns | :BackVow | :ъ ] :у :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ :0 - AbsVow: ] _ ;  ! for words like кёзюуюнде
            [ [ :AmbigVow | :FrontVow ] :у :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ :0 - [ AbsVow: |  %{ꚜ%}: ] ]* _ ;  ! for words like кёзюуюнде
            [ ( \:BackVow ) :AmbigVow :Cns* %{ь%}: :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - [ %{ꚜ%}: | AbsVow: ] ] | :ь | %{ъ%}:0 ]* _ ; ! юсюнде
            %{ү%}: [ [ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{ꚜ%}: ] ] | :Cns | %-: ]* _ ; ! for numerals and abbreviations
            :BackRoundVow й:0 %>: _ ; ! къоюб
        except
            %{n%}: %>: %{N%}: _ .#. ; ! after px3sp

!@ б о л >:0 {I}:у ш >:0 {I}:у р >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:ъ {A}:а

!@ б о л >:0 {I}:у р >:0 {G}:г {ъ}:ъ {A}:а

!@ б о л >:0 {I}:у р

!@ т ё л е у >:0 {I}:ю

!@ т ю б >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ю {n}:0

"{I} as у after back rounded vowels"
%{I%}:у <=> [ [ [ :BackVow | [ :Cns (:ъ) ] | .#. ] :у ] | :о ] [ [ :у | :Cns ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{n%}: ] ] | :ь | :ъ | %{ъ%}: ]* _ ;
            [ %{I%}:у :Cns+ ]/[ :0 - %{ь%}: ]* _ ;
            %{о%}: [ [ :0 - AbsVow: ] | :Cns | %-: ]* _ ; ! for numerals and abbreviations
            [ \[ :AmbigVow | :FrontVow ] :BackVow :ю :Cns+ ]/[ :0 - AbsVow: ]* _ ; ! союзну
            ! [ :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{ь%}: ] ]* _ ;  ! самолётун  ! crucially, doesn't have {ꚜ} in context
            ! FIXME: The following seems to be breaking forms like тюбю
            [ :AmbigVow :Cns/[ :0 - %{ꚜ%}: ]* %{ꚜ%}: [ :Cns/[ :0 - %{ꚜ%}: ]* %{ꚜ%}: ]* ]/[ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{ь%}: | %{ꚜ%}: ] ]* _ ; ! самолётун
            ! :AmbigVow :Cns %{ꚜ%}: :0* _ ;
            [ [ :BackVow ] :у ]/[ :0 - [ AbsVow: ] | %{ь%}: ]* _ ; ! башланыуу
            :BackRoundVow %{n%}: %>: %{❗%}: %{N%}: _ .#. ; ! after px3sp
            [ :BackVow :у :Cns+ ]/[ :0 ]* _ .#. ; ! after px3sp
        except
            %{n%}: %>: %{N%}: _ .#. ; ! after px3sp

!@ д ж а ш а >:0 {I}:0 у >:0 {N}:н {I}:у

!@ и ю н ь {ꚜ}:0 >:0 {s}:0 {I}:у {n}:н >:0 {D}:д {A}:а

!@ с а м о л ё т {ꚜ}:0 >:0 {s}:0 {I}:у {n}:0


!!!! Epenthesis !!!!

"Always realise {е} as е after ск"
%{е%}:е <=> с к (%{ь%}:) _ (%{☭%}:) %>: ;

"Epenthesis in some stems"
%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"{s} realised after vowels"
!%{s%}:с <=> [ [ ? :Vow ] - [ :Vow :у ] ]/[ :0 ]* _ ;
%{s%}:с <=> [ ? :Vow ]/[ :0 ]* _ ;
        except
            [ :Vow :у ]/[ :0 - %{s%}: ]* _ ;

!@ а й н ы >:0 {I}:0 у >:0 {s}:0 {I}:у {n}:0

!@ к:к ё:ё з:з ю:ю у:у >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ю {n}:н >:0 {D}:д {A}:е 

!@ к ё з ю у >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ю {n}:0 >:0 {N}:н {I}:ю

!"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
!%{s%}:0 <=> :CnsRight/[ :0 - AbstrCns: ] _ ;
!                 AbstrCns:/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;
!                           :BackVow  :у  %>: _ ;
!          except 
!            [ [ ? :Vow ] - [ :BackVow  :у ] ] %>: _ ;
!
!
!"Surfacing of {s} after a vowel"
!%{s%}:с <=> [ [ ? :Vow ] - [ :BackVow :у ] ] %>: _ ;
!
!@ о:о н:н о:о у:у >:0 {s}:0 {I}:у {n}:н >:0 {D}:д {A}:а 


!!!! Deleteion !!!!

"Remove soft sign with suffix"
ь:0 <=> _ [ :0 - %>: ]* %>: [ :0 - %>: ]* [ :Cns | :Vow ] ;
    except
        _ %{❗%}: ; ! to analyse forms where ь isn't removed, probably orthography errors

"Plural -р- only appears before possessives"
%{р%}:р <=> _ %>: [ %{s%}: | %{I%}: м | %{I%}: н г | %{I%}: б %{I%}: з | %{I%}: г %{ъ%}: %{I%}: з ] ; 


"Delete {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> :Vow/[ :0 - %{s%}: ]* _ ;
            %{n%}: %>: %{N%}: _ .#. ; ! after px3sp
        except
            [ [ :Cns | .#. ] :Vow :у ]/[ [ :0 - %{s%}: ] | :ь | :ъ ]* _ ;
            [ :Cns | :FrontVow ] :AmbigVow [ [ :у | :Cns ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - %{ꚜ%}: ] | :ь | %{ъ%}:0 ]* _ ;
            :FrontVow [ :у :Cns* ]/[ :0 ]* _ ; ! e.g., тёлеую
            [ \[ :Cns | :BackVow | :ъ ] :у :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/:0 _ ;  ! for words like кёзюуюнде
            [ :AmbigVow :Cns* %{ь%}: :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - %{ꚜ%}: ] | :ь | %{ъ%}:0 ]* _ ;

            ! for numerals and abbreviations
            AbsVow: [ [ :0 - AbsVow: ] | :Cns | %-: ]* _ ; 

				! avoid conflict with {I}:у 
            [ [ [ :BackVow | [ :Cns (:ъ) ] | .#. ] :у ] | :о ] [ [ :у | :Cns ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{n%}: ] ] | :ь | :ъ | %{ъ%}: ]* _ ;  
            [ :BackVow :ю :Cns+ ]/:0* _ ; ! союзну
            [ :BackVow ] :у/[ :0 - [ AbsVow: | %{s%}: ] | %{ь%}: ]* _ ;

            ! other conflicts
            :BackRoundVow й:0 %>: _ ; ! къоюб

"Delete й before back {I}:ю or front {A}:е"
й:0 <=> :BackRoundVow _ %>: %{I%}: ;
        [ :AmbigVow | FrontVow: ] _ %>: [ %{A%}:е | %{E%}:е ] ;

!@ к ъ о й:0 >:0 {I}:ю п
!@ с ү й:0 >:0 {E}:е >:0 м {A}:е

!"Delete {n} before gen, acc, and end of word"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ :0* :н ;
!            _ .#. ;
"Realise {n} as н before dat/loc/abl"
%{n%}:н <=> _ :0* %{G%}: ;
            _ :0* %{D%}: %{A%}: ;

!"{n} is 0 before gen, acc; end of word; м; д%{I%} (etc.)"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ :0* [ :н - %{G%}: ] ;
!           _ .#. ;
!           _ :0* :м ;
!           _ :0* :д %{I%}: ;
